North Carolina, session 2025, HB822.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-140.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-140.4. Special provisions for motorcycles and mopeds.
(a) No person shall operate a motorcycle or moped upon a highway or public vehicular
area:
(1) When the number of persons upon or within such motorcycle or moped,
including the operator, shall exceed the number of persons which it was
designed to carry. For purposes of this subdivision, a moped is presumed to
be designed for use by one person, unless the operator provides documentation
from the manufacturer that indicates otherwise.
…."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-146 is amended by adding the following new subsections to
read:
"(f) Except when preparing for a left turn, it shall be unlawful for any person to operate a
moped on a highway in any lane other than the right-hand side of the right-hand lane then
available for through traffic where the posted speed limit is greater than 35 miles per hour. A
person who operates a moped in violation of this subsection shall have committed an infraction.
(g) No person shall operate a moped upon a highway where the posted speed limit is
greater than 35 miles per hour."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to a moped
operated on or after that day.
*H822-v-1*